lexicon/dev/spellrelax.twol
Alphabet

   А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н Ң О Ө П Р С Т У Ү Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я
   а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н ң о ө п р с т у ү ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я


   %':%' 
   %`:%` %':%` 
   %ʻ:%ʻ %':%ʻ 
   %’:%’ %':%’  
   %‘:%‘ %':%‘ 
   %ʼ:%ʼ %':%ʼ 
   
   V
   I
   X:Х X:X
   ё:е 
   Ё:Е ; 

Rules

"Unify apostrophe styles"
a => _ ;

"Accept ж for дж word initially"
д:0 => _ ж ;
